Arkansas, session 2025, SB448.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code §§ 8-15-101 — 8-15-105 are amended to read as
follows:
8-15-101. Title.
This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Property Assessed
Clean Energy Capital Expenditure Act”.

8-15-102. Definitions.
As used in this chapter:
(1)(A) “Bond” means a revenue bond or note issued under this
*MBM043*
03-31-2025 15:34:07 MBM043

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB448
chapter.;
(B) “Bond” includes any other financial obligation
authorized by this chapter, the laws of this state, or the Arkansas
Constitution;
(2) "Capital provider" means an entity or entities, including
without limitation a designee, a successor, or an assignee of the entity or
entities, that is authorized to finance or refinance any qualifying
improvements under this chapter;
(2)(3) “District” means a property assessed energy capital
expenditure improvement district established in this state by law for the
express purpose of managing the to facilitate PACE program financing under
this chapter;
(4) "Eligible property" means privately owned commercial,
industrial, agricultural, nonprofit, mixed use, or multifamily residential
real property with five (5) or more dwelling units, including without
limitation real property owned by an entity formally recognized as tax exempt
under 26 U.S.C. § 501(c), as it existed on January 1, 2025;
(5) "Financing agreement" means the contract between a property
owner and a capital provider under which a property owner agrees to repay a
capital provider for the qualifying improvement's financing or refinancing,
including without limitation:
(A) Details of finance charges, fees, debt servicing,
accrual of interest, and penalties; and
(B) Terms relating to treatment of prepayment and partial
payment, billing, collection, and enforcement of the repayment of the
financing;
(3)(6) “Governmental entity” means a municipality, city, county,
combination of cities or counties or both, or statewide district;
(4)(7) “Owner” means an individual, partnership, association,
corporation, or other legal entity that is recognized by law and has title or
interest in any real property;
(5)(8) “PACE program” means a property assessed clean energy
capital expenditure program under which a real property owner an owner of
eligible property can finance an a qualifying energy efficiency improvement,
a renewable energy project, and a water conservation improvement on the real
eligible property; and
03-31-2025 15:34:07 MBM043

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB448
(6)(9) “Person” means an individual, partnership, association,
corporation, or other legal entity recognized by law as having the power to
contract;
(10) "Program administrator" means:
(A) The department or individual within a governmental
entity or district designated by the governmental entity or district to
administer the PACE program; or
(B) A private independent third party designated by the
governmental entity or district to administer the PACE program, provided that
the administration procedures conform to this chapter;
(11) "Program guidebook" means a comprehensive document or
collection of documents that:
(A) Illustrates the applicable PACE program; and
(B) Establishes appropriate guidelines, specifications,
approval criteria, standard forms, and uniform documents consistent with the
administration of a PACE program and not detailed in this chapter;
(12) "Special assessment" means a voluntary lien imposed by a
governmental entity on real eligible property located within the boundaries
of a PACE program; and
(13) "Qualifying improvement" means a permanently affixed energy
efficiency improvement, alternative energy improvement, building resiliency
improvement, or water conservation improvement installed on an eligible
property as part of the construction or renovation of the eligible property.

8-15-103. Legislative findings.
The General Assembly finds that:
(1) It is in the best interests interest of the state to
authorize property assessed energy improvement districts or capital providers
that make available to citizens one (1) or more financing programs, including
without limitation a PACE program, to fund qualifying energy efficiency
improvements, renewable energy projects, and water conservation improvements
on residential, commercial, industrial, and other real to eligible properties
at the request of the owner;
(2) The programs described in subdivision (1) of this section
will benefit the citizens of this state by:
(A) Decreasing the cost of providing funds to
03-31-2025 15:34:07 MBM043

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB448
participating citizens and lowering the aggregate issuance and servicing
costs of loans financing; and
(B) Making funds available to rural communities throughout
the state that might not otherwise create and finance the programs described
in subdivision (1) of this section; and
(3) The programs described in subdivision (1) of this section
will further the public purpose of:
(A) Creating jobs and stimulating the state's economy;
(B) Generating significant economic development through
the investment of the proceeds of loans financing in local communities,
including without limitation increased sales tax revenue;
(C) Protecting participating citizens from the financial
impact of the rising cost of electricity produced from nonrenewable fuels
utilities and property insurance;
(D) Providing positive cash flow in which the costs of the
improvements are lower than the energy savings on an average monthly basis;
(E)(D) Providing the citizens of this state with informed
choices and additional options for financing improvements that may not
otherwise be available;
(F)(E) Increasing the value of the improved real eligible
property for participating citizens;
(G)(F) Improving the state's air quality and conserving
natural resources, including water;
(H)(G) Attracting manufacturing facilities and related
jobs to the state; and
(I)(H) Promoting energy independence and security for the
state and the nation.

8-15-104. Immunity.
(a) The powers and duties of a property assessed energy improvement
district or governmental entity conferred by this chapter are public and
governmental functions exercised for a public purpose and for matters of
public necessity.
(b) The district or governmental entity and its personnel are immune
from suit in tort for the performance of its duties under this chapter
unless:
03-31-2025 15:34:07 MBM043

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB448
(1) immunity Immunity from tort is expressly waived in writing;
or
(2) The district or governmental entity acts with gross
negligence.


8-15-105. Authority to create PACE program districts.
(a) A governmental entity legally authorized to issue general revenue
bonds may create a property assessed energy improvement district by adoption
of an ordinance.
(b) A combination of governmental entities may create a district by
each governmental entity:
(1) Adopting an ordinance that provides for the governmental
entity's participation in the district; and
(2) Entering into a joint agreement with one (1) or more other
participating governmental entities.
(c) This section shall not limit additional governmental entities from
becoming members of the district under § 8-15-106.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 8-15-106 is amended to read as follows:
8-15-106. Membership in an existing district.
(a) To become a member of an existing property assessed energy
improvement district, the governing body of a governmental entity shall:
(1) Adopt an ordinance that provides for the participation of
the governmental entity in the district; and
(2) Enter into an agreement with the other participating members
of the district.
(b) The agreement between members of a district shall establish the
terms and conditions of the operation of the district with the limitations
provided in this chapter.
(c)(1) Notwithstanding §§ 8-15-108 and 8-15-109, the method of
appointment and terms of office for each member of the district board of
directors may be altered by agreement of participating governmental entities.
(2) In no event shall the district board of directors be
composed of fewer than seven (7) members.

03-31-2025 15:34:07 MBM043

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB448
SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 8-15-107(a), concerning the board of
directors of a district, is amended to read as follows:
(a) A property assessed energy improvement district created under this
chapter shall be operated and controlled by a board of directors.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code §§ 8-15-108 — 8-15-113 are amended to read as
follows:
8-15-108. Membership on the district board of directors.
(a) The board of directors of a property assessed energy improvement
district shall consist of at least seven (7) directors.
(b) The board of directors shall include:
(1) For a statewide district, the members specified in the
agreement establishing the district;
(2) For a district composed of a combination of one (1) or more
counties and one (1) or more cities:
(A) The county judge or his or her designated
representative of each county that is a member of the district;
(B) The mayor or his or her designated representative of
each city that is a member of the district; and
(C) If the number of directors is fewer than seven (7)
after fulfilling the requirements of subdivisions (b)(2)(A) and (B) of this
section, additional members shall be appointed as specified in the agreement
establishing the district until a total of seven (7) directors has been
appointed;
(3) For a district composed of one (1) or more counties:
(A) The county judge or his or her designated
representative of each county that is a member of the district; and
(B) If the number of directors is fewer than seven (7)
after fulfilling the requirements of subdivision (b)(3)(A) of this section,
additional members shall be appointed as specified in the agreement
establishing the district until a total of seven (7) directors has been
appointed; and
(4) For a district composed of one (1) or more cities:
(A) The mayor or his or her designated representative of
each city that is a member of the district; and
(B) If the number of directors is fewer than seven (7)
03-31-2025 15:34:07 MBM043

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB448
after fulfilling the requirements of subdivision (b)(4)(A) of this section,
additional members shall be appointed as specified in the agreement
establishing the district until a total of seven (7) directors has been
appointed.
(c) The designated representative of a county judge or mayor under
subsection (b) of this section shall be a qualified elector of the
jurisdiction that the designated representative is appointed to represent.

8-15-109. Terms of district directors.
(a) A director who is a public official may serve on the board of
directors of a property assessed energy improvement district during his or
her term of office as the county judge or mayor of a member of the district.
(b) A director who is the designated representative of the mayor or
county judge of a member of the city or county that is a member of a the
district serves at the pleasure of the mayor of the city or the county judge
of the county that is a member of the district.

8-15-110. District boards of directors — Meetings.
(a) The board of directors of a property assessed energy improvement
district shall hold quarterly meetings and special meetings, as needed, in a
courthouse or other location within the district.
(b) The time and place of the quarterly meetings shall be on file in
the office of the district board of directors.

8-15-111. District boards of directors — Powers and duties.
(a) The board of directors of a property assessed energy improvement
district may:
(1) Issue revenue bonds on behalf of the district;
(2) Make and adopt all necessary bylaws for its organization and
operation;
(3) Elect officers and employ personnel necessary for its
operation;
(4) Operate, maintain, expand, and fund a PACE project program;
(5) Apply for, receive, and spend grants for any purpose under
this chapter;
(6) Enter into agreements and contracts on behalf of the
03-31-2025 15:34:07 MBM043

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB448
district;
(7) Receive property or funds by gift or donation for the
finance and support of the district;
(8) Reimburse a governmental entity for expenses incurred in
performing a service for the district;
(9) Assign assessments to a private lending institution; and
(10) Do all things necessary or appropriate to carry out the
powers expressly granted or duties expressly imposed under this chapter.
(b) The To offset the actual and reasonable costs of tax billing and
collection, the board of directors shall establish and the county officer may
accept or reject a reasonable annual fee or one-time-per-project commission
to be paid to the county assessor, the county collector, and the county
treasurer.
(2)(c) Adopt The board of directors shall adopt rules consistent
with this chapter or with other legislation that in its judgment may be
necessary for the proper enforcement of this chapter.

8-15-112. Reporting District reporting requirement — Collection of
assessments.
(a)(1)(A) By March 1 of each year or upon the creation of a property
assessed energy improvement district that uses or intends to use the county
collector for collection of district assessments, the board of directors of a
district shall file an annual report with the county clerk in any county in
which a portion of the district is located.
(B) The annual report required under this section shall be
available for inspection and copying by assessed landowners in the district.
(C) The county clerk shall not charge any costs or fees
for filing the annual report required under this section.
(D) The district shall deliver a filed copy of the annual
report required under this section to the county collector within five (5)
days of filing.
(2) The annual report required under this section shall contain
the following information as of December 31 of the current calendar year:
(A) A list of contracts, identity of the parties to the
contracts, and obligations of the district;
(B) Any indebtedness, including bonded indebtedness, and
03-31-2025 15:34:07 MBM043

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB448
the reason for the indebtedness, including the following:
(i) The stated payout or maturity date of the
indebtedness, if any; and
(ii) The total existing delinquent assessments and
the party responsible for the collection;
(C) Identification of each member of the board of
directors of the district and each member's contact information;
(D) The date, time, and location for any scheduled meeting
of the board of directors of the district for the following year;
(E) The contact information for the district assessor;
(F) Information concerning to whom the county treasurer is
to pay district assessments;
(G) An explanation of the applicable statutory penalties,
interest, and costs;
(H) The method used to compute district assessments; and
(I) A statement itemizing the income and expenditures of
the district, including a statement of fund and account activity for the
district; and
(J) A statement as to whether assessments of the district
are collected publicly or privately.
(b)(1) A The board of directors of a district that does not comply
with subsection (a) of this section commits a violation punishable by a fine
of not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than one thousand
dollars ($1,000) for each offense.
(2) A fine recovered under subdivision (b)(1) of this section
shall be deposited into the county clerk's cost fund.
(c)(1) On or before December 31, the board of directors of a district
shall file its list of special assessments for the following calendar year
with the county clerk.
(2)(A) After filing the list of special assessments under
subdivision (c)(1) of this section, the board of directors of a district
shall deliver a copy of the filed list of special assessments to the preparer
of the tax books.
(B) If the county collector is not the designated preparer
of the tax books, the board of directors of the district shall deliver a copy
of the filed list of special assessments to the county collector.
03-31-2025 15:34:07 MBM043

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB448
(3) The list of special assessments required under subdivision
(c)(1) of this section shall contain:
(A) A list of each parcel with an assessment levied
against it within the district; and
(B) The contact information for the district assessor.
(4) The list of special assessments required under subdivision
(c)(1) of this section shall not include assessments on parcels that
otherwise would not appear on the tax books for the following year.
(5) After the December 31 deadline to file the list of special
assessments required under subdivision (c)(1) of this section, the county
collector may reject an assessment submitted by the board of directors of the
district for inclusion in the list of special assessments.
(d)(1) After the board of directors of the district files the list of
special assessments required under subsection (c) of this section, the county
collector shall collect the assessments at the same time the county collector
collects the other taxes on the property.
(2) The county collector shall pay the funds collected under
subdivision (d)(1) of this section to the county treasurer at the same time
that the county collector pays all other taxes to the county treasurer.
(3) The county treasurer shall distribute the funds received
under subdivision (d)(2) of this section to the district in the same manner
as he or she distributes funds to other tax entities.

8-15-113. Financing projects in PACE program districts.
(a) A property assessed energy improvement The board of directors of a
district may establish a PACE program to provide loans facilitate financing
for the initial acquisition and installation or permanent financing of energy
efficiency improvements, renewable energy projects, and water conservation
improvements a qualifying improvement with a consenting real property owner
or owners of existing real eligible property and or new construction.
(b)(1) The board of directors of the district may authorize by
resolution the issuance of bonds or the execution of a contract with a
governmental entity or a private entity to provide the loans financing under
subsection (a) of this section.
(2) The resolution shall include without limitation the
following:
03-31-2025 15:34:07 MBM043

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB448
(A) The type of renewable energy project, water
conservation improvement, or energy efficiency qualifying improvement for
which the loan financing may be offered;
(B) The proposed arrangement for the loan financing
program, including without limitation:
(i) A statement concerning the source of funding
that will be used to pay for work performed qualifying improvements under the
loan contract financing agreement;
(ii) The interest rate and time period during which a
contracting real consenting eligible property owner or owners would repay the
loan financing; and
(iii) The method of apportioning all or any portion
of the costs incidental to the financing, administration, and collection of
the arrangement among the consenting real eligible property owner or owners
and the governmental entity;
(C) A minimum and maximum aggregate dollar amount that may
be financed per property;
(D)(i) A method for prioritizing requests from real
property owners for financing if the requests appear likely to exceed the
authorization amount of the loan financing program.
(ii) Priority shall be given to those requests from
real property owners that meet the eligibility requirements on a first-come,
first-served basis;
(E) Identification of a local official authorized to enter
into loan financing contracts on behalf of the district; and
(F) A draft contract specifying the terms and conditions
proposed by the board of directors of the district.
(c)(1) The district may combine the loan payment required by the loan
contract with the billing for the real property tax assessment for the real
property where the renewable energy project, water conservation improvement,
or the energy efficiency improvement is installed.
(2) The district may establish the order in which a loan payment
will be applied to the different charges.
(3) The district may not combine the billing for a loan payment
required by a contract authorized under this section with a billing of
another county or political subdivision unless the county or political
03-31-2025 15:34:07 MBM043

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB448
subdivision has given its consent by a resolution or ordinance.
(d)(c) The district shall offer private lending institutions the
opportunity to participate in local loan programs established under this
section.
(e)(1)(A) In order to secure a loan authorized under this section, the
district may place a lien equal in value to the loan against any real
property where the renewable energy project, water conservation improvement,
or the energy efficiency improvement is installed.
(B) The lien shall attach to the real property when it is
filed in the county recorder's office for record.
(2)(A)(i) The priority of the lien created under this chapter is
determined based on the date of filing of the lien.
(ii) Except as provided in subdivision (e)(2)(A)(iii)
of this section, the priority of the lien shall be determined in the same
manner as the priority for other real property tax and assessment liens.
(iii) A lien created under this chapter shall be
subordinate to any real or personal property tax liens.
(iv) A district shall discharge the lien created
under this chapter upon full payment of the lien.
(B) If the real property is sold, the lien shall stay
attached to the real property, and the loan created under this chapter will
be owed by the new real property owner.
(C) If the real property enters into default or
foreclosure:
(i) Payment of the assessment shall not be sought
from a member of the district who does not own the real property that entered
into default or foreclosure;
(ii) Repayment of the assessment shall not be
accelerated automatically; and
(iii) The balance of the assessment shall be repaid
according to the terms of the agreed-upon schedule.
(3) The district may bundle or package the loans for transfer to
private lenders in a manner that would allow the liens to remain in full
force to secure the loans.
(f)(1) Before the enactment of an ordinance under this section, a
public hearing shall be held at which interested persons may object to or
03-31-2025 15:34:07 MBM043

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB448
inquire about the proposed loan program or any of its particulars.
(2) The public hearing shall be advertised one (1) time per week
for two (2) consecutive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation in the
district.

SECTION 5. Arkansas Code Title 8, Chapter 15, is amended to add
additional sections to read as follows:
8-15-114. Authority to establish direct PACE financing program.
(a) A governing body of a governmental entity may:
(1) By ordinance establish a PACE program within a designated
area to make available property assessed capital expenditure financing or
refinancing for qualifying improvements to the owner or owners of the
eligible property from capital providers; and
(2) Exercise all powers granted under this chapter.
(b) To establish a direct financing PACE program under this section,
the governing body of the governmental entity shall adopt an ordinance which
includes:
(1) A finding that financing or refinancing of qualified
improvements, repaid through special assessments on the eligible property
benefitted by the qualifying improvement, is a valid public purpose;
(2) A statement that the governmental entity acting as a
district intends to make special assessments to repay financing or
refinancing from capital providers for qualifying improvement projects to
voluntary and willing owners of eligible real property;
(3) A legal description of the boundaries of the designated area
of the program;
(4) The incorporation by reference of the program guidebook;
(5) A description of the types of qualifying improvements
eligible for the PACE program;
(6) Authorization of direct financing between an eligible
property owner and a capital provider to finance or refinance qualifying
improvements;
(7) Authorization and direction for a governmental entity
official to enter into a special assessment agreement with the owner of
eligible property and a capital provider, impose special assessments, and
assign the rights to the special assessment liens and payments for special
03-31-2025 15:34:07 MBM043

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB448
assessments authorized under this chapter to capital providers;
(8)(A) Designation of a program administrator.
(B) If applicable, the governing body of the governmental
entity shall describe any method of procurement that will be used to select
and designate a third-party program administrator;
(9) A requirement that the interest rate, delinquent interest,
penalties, terms of prepayment, and other terms of a PACE program special
assessment shall be established by a capital provider in the related special
assessment financing agreement for the assessment; and
(10) Direction to the preparer of tax books of the county in
which the eligible property is located to include a special assessment
imposed under this section on the property tax bill for the eligible property
subject to the special assessment financing agreement and to collect the
special assessment with real property taxes.
(c) A governmental entity may:
(1) Administer a program;
(2) Delegate administration of a program to a third party under
§ 8-15-116 or a governmental entity acting as a district; or
(3) Authorize the private collection of PACE program assessments
by the third-party program administrator or capital provider under the terms,
at times, and through methods described in the financing agreement.
(d)(1) If the program provides for third-party administration, the
local government official authorized to enter into a written contract with a
property owner under § 8-15-114(b)(7) shall also enter into a written
contract with the party that administers the program.
(2) The contract shall require the third party to reimburse the
local government for costs associated with:
(A) Monitoring the program;
(B) Imposing the assessment; and
(C) Billing and collecting payments.
(e) The financing for special assessments imposed under the PACE
program may include without limitation:
(1) The cost of materials and labor necessary for the
installation or modification of a qualified improvement;
(2) Permit fees;
(3) Inspection fees;
03-31-2025 15:34:07 MBM043

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB448
(4) Lender fees;
(5) Program application and administrative fees;
(6) Project development and engineering fees;
(7) Interest reserves;
(8) Capitalized interest, in an amount determined by the owner
of the commercial property and the third-party providing financing under this
chapter; and
(9) Other fees or costs incurred by the property owner
incidental or ancillary to the installation, modification, or improvement on
a specific or pro rata basis, as determined by the local government.
(f)(1) Notes and other financial instruments issued under this section
are:
(A) Not general obligations of the governmental entity;
and
(B) Solely payable from special assessments on eligible
property benefitted by the qualifying improvements.
(2)(A) The State of Arkansas or a governmental entity shall not
use public tax revenue to fund or repay a PACE program assessment.
(B) This section does not authorize a governmental entity
to pledge, offer, or encumber its full faith and credit, and a governmental
entity shall not pledge, offer, or encumber its full faith and credit under
this section.
(g)(1) A program administrator or governmental entity may impose a
one-time administration fee for approved applications.
(2) Fees under subdivision (d)(1) of this section shall be
limited to the lessor of:
(A) One percent (1%) of the principal amount financed; or
(B) Fifty thousand dollars ($50,000).
(h) The governmental entity shall assign the right to payments from a
special assessment from the owner of eligible property with a qualifying
improvement to the capital provider who finances the qualifying improvement.
(i) Before entering into a special assessment financing agreement
under this section, an owner of eligible property shall submit a PACE project
application to the program administrator in a form consistent with the
program guidebook, which shall include:
(1) Certification that the proposed qualifying improvement meets
03-31-2025 15:34:07 MBM043

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB448
the guidelines established in the program guidebook;
(2) Certification that the owner requesting the proposed
qualifying improvement is the owner of record of the property on which the
special assessment will be imposed and that there are no delinquent taxes or
special assessments on the property; and
(3) The name of the capital provider providing the special
assessment financing and the proposed terms of the special assessment
financing agreement, including:
(A) The special assessment financing amount;
(B) The interest rate;
(C) Any administrative fees paid to the governmental
entity or program administrator;
(D) A schedule of the installments of the special
assessment;
(E) The number of years the special assessment shall be
imposed on the eligible property;
(F) Delinquent interest and penalties; and
(G) The conditions by which the owner may prepay and
permanently satisfy the debt owed under the special assessment financing
agreement and remove the special assessment lien from the property.
(j) Before entering into a special assessment agreement or imposing a
special assessment lien upon an eligible property, the governmental entity
shall receive from the program administrator certification that the proposed
qualifying improvement, eligible property, and owner qualify for financing
under the PACE program.

8-15-115. Collection of PACE program assessments.
(a)(1) A PACE program special assessment payment shall be collected in
a manner specified in the financing agreement.
(2) Assessments privately collected by a third-party program
administrator under § 8-15-114(c)(3) may be collected at times specified by
the financing agreement.
(3) Money derived from the imposition and collection of a PACE
program special assessment payment shall be accounted for separate from other
county funds.
(4) Each PACE program special assessment payment received by the
03-31-2025 15:34:07 MBM043

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB448
county shall be promptly remitted to the capital provider financing the
qualifying improvement on the eligible property upon which the special
assessment lien has been levied.
(b)(1) In order to secure PACE program financing authorized under this
chapter, a governmental entity or district shall enter into a special
assessment agreement with an owner of eligible property, and a capital
provider in the case of direct PACE program financing, and shall subsequently
record a special assessment lien equal in value to the total PACE financing
amount against the eligible property where a qualifying improvement is
installed.
(2) The special assessment lien shall attach to the eligible
property when it is filed of record in the county recorder's office in the
county in which the eligible property is located.
(3) The recording of the special assessment lien shall include:
(A) The legal description of the eligible property;
(B) The county assessor's parcel number of the eligible
property;
(C) The grantor's name, which shall be the same as the
owner on the special assessment agreement;
(D) The grantee's name, which shall be the governmental
entity or district on whose authority the qualifying improvement is approved;
(E) The date on which the special assessment lien was
created;
(F) The principal amount of the special assessment lien;
(G) The terms and length of the special assessment lien;
and
(H) A copy of the special assessment financing agreement.
(c) The priority of a special assessment lien created under this
chapter shall be superior to all other liens, claims, and titles except for a
lien for general ad valorem property taxes or a district lien that is coequal
to property taxes.
(d) A governmental entity or district shall remove the special
assessment lien from the property and record a discharge of the special
assessment lien created under this chapter upon full payment of the special
assessment lien.
(e) If the eligible property is sold, the:
03-31-2025 15:34:07 MBM043

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB448
(1) Special assessment lien runs with the land and shall stay
attached to the eligible property; and
(2) Remaining special assessment financing created under this
chapter is owed according to the term of the financing agreement by the new
eligible property owner.
(f) If the eligible property enters into default or foreclosure:
(1) Payment of the special assessment shall not be sought from
the governmental entity or a member of the district who does not own the
eligible property that entered into default or foreclosure;
(2) The special assessment lien runs with the land, and that
portion of the special assessment lien that has not yet become due is not
accelerated or eliminated by the foreclosure or default of the special
assessment lien or any lien for taxes or assessments imposed by the state, a
local government, or district against the eligible property on which the
special assessment lien is imposed; and
(3) The balance of the special assessment shall be repaid
according to the terms of the agreed-upon schedule in the financing
agreement.
(i) Delinquent payments due on a special assessment incur interest and
penalties as specified in the financing agreement.
(j) Delinquent payments due on special assessments shall be enforced
in the event of nonpayment of the special assessment or an installment of a
special assessment.
(k) Delinquent payments due on special assessments have the effect of
a delinquent mortgage payment and shall be foreclosed and sold in the manner
provided by law for the foreclosure of mortgages on eligible property.
(l) The governmental entity or district on whose authority the
qualifying improvement was authorized shall institute proceedings to
foreclose the special assessment lien against the eligible property for which
payment of the special assessment or installment of the special assessment is
delinquent.
(m) In an action seeking the foreclosure of a special assessment lien
against an eligible property, if there is no other purchaser for the eligible
property having a delinquent special assessment lien, the governmental entity
or district on whose authority the qualifying improvement was authorized may:
(1) Offer the eligible property to the capital provider if all
03-31-2025 15:34:07 MBM043

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB448
outstanding taxes are paid by the capital provider;
(2) Purchase the property sold at a foreclosure sale; or
(3) Bid, in lieu of cash, the full amount of the assessment,
interest, penalties, attorney's fees and costs found by the court to be due
and payable under the special assessment lien, and any costs taxed by the
court in the foreclosure proceedings against the eligible property ordered
sold.
(n) If a governmental entity or district fails or refuses to foreclose
and sell an eligible property for the delinquent installments due on a
special assessment following delinquency of a special assessment payment, the
capital provider who financed the qualifying improvement for the eligible
property may initiate foreclosure of the special assessment lien for the
delinquent special assessment installments in the manner provided by law for
the foreclosure of mortgages on real estate.
(o) Whenever a county is delinquent in the remittance of a special
assessment payment received from an owner of eligible property to a capital
provider who financed the qualifying improvement for the eligible property,
the capital provider who financed the qualifying improvement for the eligible
property has the rights and remedies for the collection and remittance of the
special assessment as are given by law for the collection of judgments or
other matters of local concern against cities, counties, and school
districts.

SECTION 6. Arkansas Code §§ 8-15-114 — 8-15-119 are amended to read as
follows:
8-15-114 116. Program guidelines.
The governmental entity or the board of directors of a property
assessed energy improvement a district, together with any third-party
administrator it may select, shall determine:
(1) The the guidelines of the PACE program as outlined in the
program guidebook, including without limitation that:
(A)(1) The base energy performance evaluation A statement
outlining what constitutes a qualifying improvement and that any
certification requirements for the improvements shall be completed by a
certified and qualified energy evaluation professional to determine existing
energy use and options for improved energy efficiency;
03-31-2025 15:34:07 MBM043

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB448
(B) The approved improvements create a positive cash flow;
(C)(2) Work A requirement that the installation of a qualifying
improvement shall be performed by qualified and certified contractors in the
field of energy efficiency and methods of renewable energy installation;
(D)(3) Performance testing and verification A requirement that
certification of qualifying improvement installation shall be performed by a
qualified professional submitted to the program administrator after the work
is completed;
(E) Adequate consumer protections are in place; and
(F)(4) The applicable underwriting standards for the
participants in the PACE program are established;
(2) The qualifications of the vendors performing installations
under this chapter;
(3)(5) The mechanisms by which the governmental entity or
district will remit the received special assessment payments and any cost
reimbursement; and
(6) Forms for the uniform PACE program documents, including
without limitation:
(A) A form for an assessment contract between the
governmental entity and the property owner specifying:
(i) The terms of assessment under the program
financing provided by a third party; and
(ii) Remedies for default or foreclosure;
(B) A form for a governmental entity notice of assessment
and PACE program special assessment lien;
(C) A form for a notice of assignment of assessment and
PACE program special assessment lien between a local government and a capital
provider;
(D) A form of consent to a PACE program special assessment
by the holder of a mortgage or deed of trust; and
(E) A form of project application with checklist
requirements and corresponding documentation that will be required by the
program administrator to approve a project application;
(7) A statement that the term of the special assessment
financing agreement will not exceed the average useful life of the longest-
lived qualifying improvement;
03-31-2025 15:34:07 MBM043

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB448
(8) A requirement that the debt service coverage ratio of the
secured property participating in a PACE program, including without
limitation PACE program special assessments from the PACE program, shall have
a minimum average ratio over the term of the PACE program financing of
1.20:1, with the debt coverage ratio formula calculated by taking the net
operating income of the property participating in the PACE program and
dividing it by total debt service plus PACE program special assessments;
(9) A requirement that the aggregate of any mortgages and
assessments taken under a PACE program shall not exceed the supervisory loan-
to-value guidelines established in 12 C.F.R Part 34, Subpart D, as it existed
on January 1, 2025;
(10) A statement explaining the mortgage lien holder consent
requirement under § 8-15-121; and
(4)(11) Any other matters necessary to implement and administer
the PACE program.

8-15-115 117. Payment by special assessments.
The credit and taxing power of the State of Arkansas and cities and
counties of this state shall not be pledged for the debt evidenced by the
PACE program liens or bonds, which are payable solely from the revenues
received from the special assessments on the participants' real property
eligible property receiving financing for a qualifying improvement under
this chapter.

8-15-116 118. Bonds.
(a) A property assessed energy improvement district may:
(1) Issue bonds to provide the PACE program loans financing
authorized by this chapter or obtain any other financing obligation
authorized by this chapter, the laws of the State of Arkansas, or the
Arkansas Constitution; and
(2) Create a debt reserve fund of legally available moneys from
nonstate sources as partial security for the bonds.
(b) Bonds issued under this chapter and income from the bonds,
including any profit made on the sale or transfer of the bonds, are exempt
from taxation in this state.
(c) Bonds issued under this chapter shall:
03-31-2025 15:34:07 MBM043

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB448
(1)(A) Be authorized by a resolution of the board of directors
of a district.
(B) The authorizing bond resolution may contain any terms,
covenants, and conditions that the board of directors deems to be reasonable
and desirable; and
(2) Have all of the qualities of and shall be deemed to be
negotiable instruments under the laws of the State of Arkansas.

8-15-117 119. Sale of bonds by districts.
The bonds may be sold in such a manner, either at public or private
sale, and upon such terms as the board of directors of a property assessed
energy improvement district shall determine to be reasonable and expedient
for effectuating the purposes of this chapter.

8-15-118 120. Revolving fund for districts.
(a) A property assessed energy improvement district or a nonprofit
corporation acting in concert with a district may maintain a revolving fund
to be held in trust by a banking institution chosen by the board of directors
of the district or the board of directors of a nonprofit corporation acting
in concert with a district separate from any other funds and administered by
the board of directors.
(b) A district may transfer into its revolving fund money from any
permissible source, including without limitation:
(1) Bond revenues;
(2) Contributions; and
(3) Loans Financings.

8-15-119 121. Notice to mortgage lender Consent from mortgage lien
holders.
At least thirty (30) days before Before the execution of an agreement
with a property assessed energy improvement district a PACE program
assessment contract, an the owner of eligible property shall provide written
notice to each mortgage lender holding a lien on the owner's property of the
owner's application to participate in a PACE program obtain and furnish to
the governmental entity or program administrator a written statement executed
and acknowledged by an authorized officer of each holder of a mortgage or
03-31-2025 15:34:07 MBM043

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB448
deed of trust securing indebtedness on the property, in the authorized
officer's sole and absolute discretion:
(1) Consenting to the PACE special assessment; and
(2) Indicating that the special assessment does not constitute
an event of default under the mortgage or deed of trust.

/s/J. Petty





























03-31-2025 15:34:07 MBM043